Illinois, session 104th, SB2528.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 8ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 9Agriculture:10FOR OPERATIONS11ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES12Payable from General Revenue Fund:13  For Personal Services.............................1,893,30014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security....................................144,90016  For Contractual Services............................325,00017  For Refunds..........................................10,00018    Total                                          $2,373,200 19    Section 10. The amount of $660,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Department of Agriculture for all costs associated 22with the Crop Insurance Rebate Initiative.   SB2528- 2 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1    Section 15. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 3the Department of Agriculture for costs associated with the 4Agriculture Equity Commission. 5    Section 20. The sum of $1,696,400, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Department of Agriculture for costs and expenses 8related to or in support of the agency's operations. 9    Section 25. The amount of $125,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Department of Agriculture to implement diversity, 12equity, and inclusion initiatives. 13    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 15Department of Agriculture for the following purposes:16Payable from the Agricultural Premium Fund:17  For expenses related to the Food Safety18   Modernization Initiative...........................100,00019  For deposit into the State Cooperative20   Extension Service Trust Fund....................10,000,00021    Total                                         $10,100,000   SB2528- 3 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1    Section 35. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Agriculture 3from the Future Farmers of America Fund for grants to the 4Illinois Association of Future Farmers of America. 5    Section 40. The sum of $550,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the Fair and Exposition 7Fund to the Department of Agriculture for costs associated 8with Future Farmers of America membership fees. 9    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 11purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 12ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 13Agriculture:14Payable from Wholesome Meat Fund:15  For Personal Services...............................270,40016  For State Contributions to State17   Employees' Retirement System.......................143,40018  For State Contributions to19   Social Security.....................................22,90020  For Group Insurance..................................66,40021  For Contractual Services............................218,40022  For Travel...........................................46,80023  For Commodities......................................12,50024  For Printing.........................................20,800  SB2528- 4 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1  For Equipment........................................46,8002  For Telecommunication Services.......................26,0003    Total                                            $874,400 4    Section 50. The sum of $324,700, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the Wholesome Meat Fund to 6the Department of Agriculture for costs and expenses related 7to or in support of the agency's operations, including prior 8years' costs. 9    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 11Department of Agriculture for the following purposes:12Payable from Partners for Conservation Fund:13  For deposit into the State Cooperative14   Extension Service Trust Fund.......................994,70015  For deposit into the State Cooperative16   Extension Service Trust Fund for17   operational expenses and programs18   at the University of Illinois Cook19   County Cooperative Extension Service.............2,449,200 20    Section 60. The sum of $3,733,100, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Tourism Promotion 22Fund to the Department of Agriculture for costs and 23operational expenses associated with the Springfield and Du   SB2528- 5 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1Quoin Illinois State Fairs and fairgrounds, not including 2personal services. 3    Section 65. The sum of $27,000,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the Agriculture Federal 5Projects Fund to the Department of Agriculture for the 6expenses of various federal projects, including, but not 7limited to, the Local Food Purchase Assistance Program, 8including prior years' costs. 9    Section 70. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 11the Department of Agriculture for:12COMPUTER SERVICES13Payable from General Revenue Fund:14  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,499,40015  For Contractual Services............................218,300 16    Section 75. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 18purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 19ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 20Agriculture:21FOR OPERATIONS22AGRICULTURE REGULATION23Payable from General Revenue Fund:  SB2528- 6 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1  For Personal Services.............................1,810,0002  For State Contributions to3   Social Security....................................138,5004  For Contractual Services..........................1,998,7005  For Travel............................................2,0006  For Commodities.......................................2,5007  For Printing..........................................1,0008  For Equipment.........................................5,0009  For Telecommunication Services.......................12,00010  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................18,00011    Total                                          $3,987,700 12    Section 80. The sum of $1,915,300, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fertilizer Control 14Fund to the Department of Agriculture for expenses relating to 15agricultural products inspection. 16    Section 85. The sum of $2,820,800, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Feed Control Fund 18to the Department of Agriculture for Feed Control. 19    Section 90. The amount of $520,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 21Agriculture from the Agriculture Federal Projects Fund for 22expenses of various federal projects, including prior years' 23costs.   SB2528- 7 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1    Section 95. The following named sums, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 3purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 4ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 5Agriculture:6MARKETING7Payable from General Revenue Fund:8  For Personal Services.............................2,331,0009  For State Contributions to10   Social Security....................................178,40011Payable from Agricultural Premium Fund:12  For Expenses Connected With the Promotion13   and Marketing of Illinois Agriculture14   and Agriculture Exports..........................1,479,90015  For Implementation of Programs16   and Activities to Promote, Develop17   and Enhance the Biotechnology18   Industry in Illinois...............................100,00019  For Expenses Related to Viticulturist20   and Enologist Contractual Staff....................150,00021Payable from Federal Agricultural Marketing 22 Services Fund:23  For Administering Illinois' Part under Public24   Law No. 733, "An Act to provide for further25   research into basic laws and principles  SB2528- 8 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1   relating to agriculture and to improve2   and facilitate the marketing and3   distribution of agricultural products", including4    prior years' costs.................................60,0005Payable from Agriculture Federal 6 Projects Fund:7  For Expenses of Various Federal Projects,8    including prior years' costs....................2,800,000 9    Section 100. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary for the objects and purposes 11hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Department of 12Agriculture:13MEDICINAL PLANTS14Payable from the Compassionate Use of Medical15 Cannabis Fund:16  For all costs associated with the17   Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis18   Program.........................................10,130,00019Payable from the Industrial Hemp Regulatory Fund:20  For all costs associated with the21   Operation, Implementation, and Enforcement22   of the Industrial Hemp Act.......................2,100,300 23    Section 105. The sum of $20,554,900, or so much thereof as 24may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cannabis Regulation   SB2528- 9 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1Fund to the Department of Agriculture for all costs associated 2with the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 3    Section 110. The sum of $430,000, or much thereof as may be 4necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 5the Department of Agriculture for the costs associated with 6the Weights and Measures Division. 7    Section 115. The following named amounts, or so much 8thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 9the Department of Agriculture for:10WEIGHTS AND MEASURES11Payable from the Weights and Measures Fund:12  For Personal Services.............................3,442,40013  For State Contributions to State14   Employees' Retirement System.....................1,754,50015  For State Contributions to16   Social Security....................................263,40017  For Group Insurance...............................1,394,40018  For Contractual Services............................383,90019  For Travel...........................................67,60020  For Commodities......................................24,20021  For Printing.........................................17,20022  For Equipment.......................................416,00023  For Telecommunication Services.......................46,80024  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................488,800  SB2528- 10 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1  For Refunds..........................................10,0002    Total                                          $8,309,2003Payable from the Motor Fuel and Petroleum 4 Standards Fund:5  For the Regulation of Motor Fuel Quality.............52,000 6    Section 120. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 8the Department of Agriculture for:9ANIMAL INDUSTRIES10Payable from General Revenue Fund:11  For Personal Services.............................1,970,00012  For State Contributions to13   Social Security....................................150,80014  For Contractual Services............................102,00015  For Travel...........................................80,00016  For Commodities......................................44,00017  For Printing..........................................2,50018  For Equipment.......................................104,00019  For Telecommunication Services.......................28,00020  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................70,00021    Total                                          $2,551,30022Payable from the Illinois Department of  23 Agriculture Laboratory Services Revolving Fund:24  For Expenses Authorized by the Animal25   Disease Laboratories Act............................41,600  SB2528- 11 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1Payable from the Agriculture Federal Projects Fund:2  For Expenses of Various Federal Projects,3   including prior years' costs.......................156,000 4    Section 125. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 6the Department of Agriculture for:7MEAT AND POULTRY INSPECTION8Payable from the General Revenue Fund:9  For Personal Services.............................5,096,30010  For State Contributions to11   Social Security....................................389,90012  For Contractual Services............................550,00013  For Travel...........................................90,00014  For Commodities.......................................8,00015  For Printing..............................................016  For Equipment........................................11,00017  For Telecommunication Services.......................44,50018  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................105,00019    Total                                          $6,294,70020Payable from Agricultural Master Fund:21  For Expenses Relating to22   Inspection of Agricultural Products..............1,410,00023Payable from Wholesome Meat Fund:24  For Personal Services.............................5,128,10025  For State Contributions to State  SB2528- 12 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,613,6002  For State Contributions to3   Social Security....................................392,3004  For Group Insurance...............................1,909,0005  For Contractual Services............................606,0006  For Travel..........................................119,6007  For Commodities......................................34,7008  For Printing..........................................2,6009  For Equipment........................................47,20010  For Telecommunication Services.......................51,50011  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................125,20012    Total                                         $11,029,80013Payable from the Agriculture Federal Projects Fund:14  For Expenses of Various Federal Projects.............60,400 15    Section 130. The following named sums, or so much thereof 16as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 17purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 18ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 19Agriculture for:20LAND AND WATER RESOURCES21Payable from the Agricultural Premium Fund:22  For Personal Services.............................1,040,00023  For State Contributions to State24   Employee's Retirement System.......................530,10025  For State Contributions to Social  SB2528- 13 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1   Security............................................79,6002  For Contractual Services............................176,8003  For Travel...........................................62,4004  For Commodities.......................................9,4005  For Printing..........................................4,2006  For Equipment........................................13,6007  For Telecommunication Services.......................25,0008  For Operation of Automotive Equipment................21,4009  For the Ordinary and Contingent10   Expenses of the Natural Resources11   Advisory Board.......................................2,10012    Total                                          $1,964,60013Payable from the Partners for Conservation Fund:14  For Personal Services...............................818,00015  For State Contributions to State16  Employees' Retirement System........................417,00017  For State Contributions to Social18   Security............................................62,60019  For Group Insurance.................................265,60020  For Expenses Relating to21   Soil Health Assessments............................250,00022    Total                                          $1,813,200 23    Section 135. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 24may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 25Agriculture from the Partners for Conservation Fund for grants   SB2528- 14 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1to Soil and Water Conservation Districts to fund projects for 2landowner cost sharing, streambank stabilization, nutrient 3loss protection and sustainable agriculture. 4    Section 140. The sum of $4,500,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 6Agriculture from the Partners for Conservation Fund for grants 7to Soil and Water Conservation Districts for ordinary and 8contingent administrative expenses. 9    Section 145. The amount of $9,880,000, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Agriculture 11Federal Projects Fund to the Department of Agriculture for 12expenses relating to various federal projects, including prior 13years' costs. 14    Section 150. The following named amounts, or so much 15thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 16the Department of Agriculture for:17ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAMS18Payable from the General Revenue Fund:19  For Administration of the Livestock20   Management Facilities Act..........................885,10021  For the Detection, Eradication, and22   Control of Exotic Pests, such as23   the Asian Long-Horned Beetle and  SB2528- 15 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1   Spongy Moth......................................1,163,9002    Total                                          $2,049,0003Payable from the Used Tire Management Fund:4  For Mosquito Control.................................50,0005Payable from Livestock Management Facilities Fund:6  For Administration of the Livestock 7   Management Facilities Act...........................56,2008Payable from Pesticide Control Fund:9  For Administration and Enforcement10   of the Illinois Pesticide Act....................8,840,00011Payable from Agriculture Pesticide Control Act Fund:12  For Expenses of Pesticide Enforcement Program,13   including prior years' costs.......................780,00014Payable from the Agriculture Federal Projects Fund:15  For Expenses of Various Federal Projects,16   including prior years' costs....................26,040,000 17    Section 155. The sum of $2,900,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 19Agriculture from the General Revenue Fund for Operations of 20the Illinois State Fair, Including Entertainment and the 21Percentage Portion of Entertainment Contracts. 22    Section 160. The sum of $7,900,000, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 24Fund to the Department of Agriculture for ordinary and   SB2528- 16 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1contingent expenses, including facilities management at the 2Illinois State Fairgrounds in Springfield and Du Quoin. 3    Section 165. The following named sums, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 5purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 6ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 7Agriculture for:8SPRINGFIELD STATE FAIR BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS9Payable from Agricultural Premium Fund:10  For Personal Services.............................2,292,00011  For State Contributions to State12   Employee's Retirement System.....................1,168,20013  For State Contributions to 14   Social Security....................................175,40015  For Operations of Buildings and16   Grounds in Springfield including17   prior years' costs...............................1,638,00018  For Awards to Livestock Breeders19   and Related Expenses...............................230,00020    Total                                          $5,503,60021Payable from Agricultural Premium Fund:22  For repairs, maintenance, and capital improvements23   Including construction, reconstruction, improvement,24   Repair and installation of capital facilities, costs of25   Planning, supplies, materials, equipment, personal  SB2528- 17 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1   services and related costs, services and all other2   expenses required to complete the work for3   Permanent Improvements at the Illinois State 4   Fairgrounds.................................... $2,106,0005Payable from the Illinois State Fair Fund:6  For Operations of the Illinois State Fair7   Including Entertainment and the Percentage8   Portion of Entertainment Contracts...............8,678,1009  For Awards and Premiums at the10   Illinois State Fair11   and related expenses...............................540,80012  For Awards and Premiums for 13   Horse Racing at the14   Illinois State Fairgrounds15   and related expenses...............................185,80016    Total                                          $9,404,700 17    Section 170. The sum of $1,560,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois State Fair 19Fund to the Department of Agriculture to promote and conduct 20activities at the Illinois State Fairgrounds at Springfield 21other than the Illinois State Fair, including administrative 22expenses. No expenditures from the appropriation shall be 23authorized until revenues from fairground uses sufficient to 24offset such expenditures have been collected and deposited 25into the Illinois State Fair Fund.   SB2528- 18 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1    Section 175. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the State Fairgrounds 3Capital Improvements and Harness Racing Fund to support the 4Department of Agriculture to provide support for harness race 5meetings, to repair and rehabilitate backstretch facilities at 6the Illinois State Fairgrounds and Du Quoin State Fairgrounds, 7and to repair and rehabilitate the capital infrastructure of 8the Illinois State Fairgrounds and Du Quoin State Fairgrounds. 9    Section 180. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 11the Department of Agriculture for:12DU QUOIN BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS13Payable from General Revenue Fund:14  For Personal Services...............................920,00015  For State Contributions to16   Social Security.....................................70,40017  For ordinary and contingent expenses18   related to the buildings and grounds at the19   DuQuoin State Fairgrounds..........................725,00020    Total                                          $1,715,40021Payable from Illinois State Fair Fund:22  For operational expenses at the Illinois State Fairgrounds23   at Du Quoin other than the Illinois State Fair24   including administrative expenses..................494,000   SB2528- 19 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1    Section 185. The sum of $806,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Agricultural Premium 3Fund to the Department of Agriculture for repairs, 4maintenance, and capital improvements including construction, 5reconstruction, improvement, repair and installation of 6capital facilities, cost of planning, supplies, materials, 7equipment, personal services and related costs, services and 8all other expenses required to complete the work for Permanent 9Improvements at the Du Quoin State Fairgrounds. 10    Section 190. The following named amounts, or so much 11thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 12the Department of Agriculture for:13DU QUOIN STATE FAIR14Payable from General Revenue Fund:15  For Personal Services...............................590,00016  For State Contributions to17   Social Security.....................................45,20018  For Contractual Services............................475,00019  For Commodities......................................20,00020  For Printing..........................................8,00021  For Telecommunication Services.......................42,00022    Total                                          $1,180,20023Payable from the Illinois State Fair Fund:24  For Entertainment and other Expenses  SB2528- 20 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1   at the Du Quoin State Fair, including2   the Percentage Portion of 3   Entertainment Contracts..........................1,100,000 4    Section 195. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 6the Department of Agriculture for:7COUNTY FAIRS AND HORSE RACING8Payable from the Agricultural Premium Fund:9  For Personal Services...............................118,10010  For State Contributions to State11   Employees' Retirement System........................60,20012  For State Contributions to13   Social Security......................................9,10014  For Contractual Services.............................13,60015  For Travel............................................2,60016  For Commodities.......................................1,00017  For Printing............................................40018  For Equipment.........................................1,10019  For Telecommunication Services........................1,10020  For Operation of Auto Equipment.........................90021  For premiums to agricultural extension22   or 4-H clubs to be distributed at a23   uniform rate.......................................817,90024  For premiums to vocational25   agriculture fairs..................................338,000  SB2528- 21 -OMB104 00008 JTR 10008 b1  For grants and other purposes for county2   fair and state fair horse racing...................342,5003    Total                                          $1,706,5004Payable from the Fair and Exposition Fund:5  For distribution to county fairs and6   fair and exposition authorities....................998,4007  For distribution to encourage and aid8   county fairs and other agricultural9   societies. This distribution shall be10   prorated and approved by the Department11   of Agriculture...................................1,891,40012  For rehabilitation of county fairgrounds..........1,366,90013Payable from the Illinois Racing  14 Quarter Horse Breeders Fund:15  For promotion of the Illinois horse16   racing and breeding industry........................31,200 17    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182025.